Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 4. Compliance with Federal Laws Relating to Cigarettes.

Sec. 43.50.400.
Sale or distribution of cigarettes; prohibitions.

A person may not

sell or distribute to consumers in this state, acquire, hold, own, possess, or transport for sale or distribution in this state, or import or cause to be imported into this state for sale or distribution in this state cigarettes

the package of which

bears a statement, label, stamp, sticker, or notice indicating that the manufacturer did not intend the cigarettes to be sold, distributed, or used in the United States, including labels stating, “for export only,” “U.S. tax-exempt,” “for use outside U.S.,” or similar wording; or

does not comply with all requirements of federal law regarding health warnings and other information on packages of cigarettes manufactured, packaged, or imported for sale, distribution, or use in the United States, including the warning labels required by 15 U.S.C. 1333 (Federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act), and all federal trademark and copyright laws;

imported into the United States on or after January 1, 2000, in violation of 26 U.S.C. 5754; or

for which a list of the ingredients added to tobacco in the manufacture of those cigarettes has not been submitted to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services as required under 15 U.S.C. 1335a (Federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act);

alter a package of cigarettes before sale or distribution to the consumer so as to remove, conceal, or obscure

a statement, label, stamp, sticker, or notice described in (1)(A)(i) of this section; or

any health warning, including a health warning that is specified in 15 U.S.C. 1333 (Federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 2000)

Sec. 43.50.410.
Imported cigarettes: requirements.

A person that imports into this state for sale or distribution in this state cigarettes manufactured outside of the United States shall file with the department, on or before the last day of each calendar quarter, for the cigarettes that the person imported into this state in the preceding calendar quarter, a statement signed by the person under penalty of perjury that the commissioner shall treat as confidential and that shall not be considered a public record under AS

40.25.110

, identifying the brand and brand styles of the cigarettes, the quantity of each brand style of cigarettes, and the person or persons to whom the cigarettes have been shipped. In this section, “calendar quarter” means each of the three-month periods ending March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110.

Sec. 43.50.420.
Enforcement.

For the purpose of enforcing AS

43.50.400

—

43.50.450

, the commissioner may share information with any local, state, or federal government agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 2000)

Sec. 43.50.430.
Applicability.

AS

43.50.400

—

43.50.450

do not apply to cigarettes

imported into the United States for personal use free of federal tax or duty, or voluntarily abandoned to the United States Secretary of the Treasury at the time of entry; or

sold or intended to be sold as duty-free merchandise by a duty-free sales enterprise in accordance with the provisions of 19 U.S.C. 1555(b); however, AS

43.50.400

—

43.50.450

apply to duty-free cigarettes that are brought back into the customs territory for resale within the customs territory.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 2000)

Sec. 43.50.450.
Definitions.

In AS

43.50.400

—

43.50.450

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“cigarette” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.170

;

“manufacturer” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.170

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 2000)